Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1712
Income withholding, defined.

Income withholding shall mean retention of an employee's or payee's income pursuant to sections 43-1720 to 43-1723.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 32;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 14.